Wyoming, session 2025, HB0319.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-15-105(a)(viii) by creating a new
subparagraph (W) and 39-16-105(a)(viii) by creating a new
subparagraph (M) are amended to read:

39-15-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following sales or leases are exempt from the
excise tax imposed by this article:

HB0319

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0217
(viii) For the purpose of exempting sales of
services and tangible personal property as an economic
incentive, the following are exempt:

(W) Purchases of mining equipment. The
following shall apply:

(I) As used in this subparagraph,
"mining equipment" shall include equipment and machinery
that is sold for use in surface, underground or in-situ
mining operations;

(II) This subparagraph is repealed
July 1, 2029.

39-16-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following purchases or leases are exempt from
the excise tax imposed by this article:

(viii) For the purpose of exempting sales of
services and tangible personal property as an economic
incentive, the following are exempt:
HB0319

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0217

(M) Purchases of mining equipment. The
following shall apply:

(I) As used in this subparagraph,
"mining equipment" shall include equipment and machinery
that is purchased for use in surface, underground or
in-situ mining operations;

(II) This subparagraph is repealed
July 1, 2029.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0319